Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 2 STATE BOARD OF PAROLE
If the parole board grants parole to an inmate on the notification list pursuant to section 17-1-119.7 (2)(a)(II), it may set the release date up to thirty days prior to the inmate's mandatory release date but not sooner than fifteen days after the file review. The department shall notify the inmate's parole sponsor to verify his or her willingness and ability to sponsor the inmate on the amended release date.

If the parole board grants parole to an inmate on the notification list pursuant to section 17-1-119.7 (2)(a)(III), it may set the release date no sooner than fifteen days after the file review. The department shall notify the inmate's parole sponsor to verify his or her willingness and ability to sponsor the inmate on the amended release date.

Except as provided in subsection (19)(b) of this section, if a person has an approved parole plan, has been assessed to be low or very low risk on the validated risk assessment scale developed pursuant to section 17-22.5-404 (2), and the parole release guidelines recommend release, the parole board may deny parole only by a majority vote of the full parole board.

An inmate is not eligible for release pursuant to subsection (19)(a) of this section if he or she has had a class I code of penal discipline violation within the previous twelve months from the date of consideration by the parole board or since incarceration, whichever is shorter; has been terminated for lack of progress or has declined in writing to participate in programs that have been recommended and made available to the inmate within the previous twelve months or since incarceration, whichever is shorter; has been regressed from community corrections or revoked from parole within the previous one hundred eighty days; is required to be considered by the full board for release; or has a pending felony charge, detainer, or an extraditable warrant.

If the parole board denies parole to an inmate pursuant to subsection (19)(a) of this section, the board shall submit to the department the basis for the denial in writing.

The parole board or an individual member of the parole board shall not deny parole solely because the inmate does not have a recommended parole plan. If the parole board considers an inmate appropriate for release except for the lack of a recommended parole plan, the parole board shall delay the release hearing decision or render a conditional release decision and request that the department submit a recommended parole plan or any other information requested by the parole board within thirty calendar days.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the parole board shall conduct a parole hearing or the board may review the application and issue a decision without a hearing, pursuant to section 17-2-201 (4)(f), within ninety days after July 6, 2021, if a person currently incarcerated has a controlling sentence for a crime enumerated in subsection (21)(b) of this section.

Eligible offenses are escape, as described in section 18-8-208, or attempt to escape, as described in section 18-8-208.1, in effect prior to March 6, 2020, if the underlying factual basis satisfies the elements of the crime of unauthorized absence or attempted unauthorized absence, as described in section 18-8-208.2 (2)(a) or (2)(b).

An inmate is not eligible for expedited parole consideration under this subsection (21) if:

The inmate is not currently at or past his or her parole eligibility date; or

The inmate is ineligible for release to parole pursuant to subsection (3.7)(a) of this section.

The department shall provide victim notification as required by section 24-4.1-303 (14)(d).

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 911, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

(3)(a), (3)(b), (6), and (7) amended, (3)(c) repealed, pp. 688, 705, §§ 27, 88, effective July 1; (3)(f) added and (5)(a) amended, p. 666, §§ 11, 12, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(5)(b) amended and (5)(c) added, p. 942, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(5)(d) added, p. 497, § 2, effective April 5; (3)(g) added and (5)(c)(II)(B) amended, p. 511, §§ 2, 1, effective April 13; (5)(c)(II)(B) amended, p. 524, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(3) and (4) R&RE, p. 639, § 4, effective June 6; (1), (2), (7), (8), (9), and (11) amended, pp. 637, 638, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1; (5)(c)(I) and (5)(c)(III) amended, p. 628, § 2, effective July 1; (5)(e) added, p. 667, § 4, effective July 1; (12) added, p. 643, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(3)(c), (7), (8), and (9)(b) amended, p. 954, § 56, effective March 13; (1)(b) amended, p. 906, § 11, effective June 15; (1) and (9)(c) amended and (5)(f) and (13) added, pp. 651, 653, §§ 7, 8, effective July 1; (5.5) added, p. 660, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(5)(g) added, p. 701, § 1, effective May 29; (5)(b) amended, p. 709, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended and (1)(c) and (1)(d) added, p. 959, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 91:

(10) amended, p. 1142, § 5, effective May 18; (4)(d) and (5.5)(g) added, p. 442, §§ 6, 7, effective May 29.

L. 92:

(1)(a) amended, p. 2172, § 22, effective June 2; (4)(e) added, p. 461, § 5, effective June 2; (5)(f)(I)(H) and (5)(f)(I)(I) amended and (5)(f)(I)(J) added, p. 211, § 14, effective August 1.

L. 94:

(1)(b), (3)(c), (4)(a), (7), (8), (9)(a)(I), and (9)(b) amended, pp. 2595, 2596, 2598, §§ 3, 4, 5, 8, effective June 3; (5.5)(b)(II) and (5.5)(c) amended, p. 2732, § 355, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(3)(c) and (9)(b) amended, p. 1272, § 5, effective June 5; (5.5)(c) amended, p. 465, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(5)(c) amended, p. 1779, § 5, effective June 3; (5)(a) amended and (5)(a.5) added, p. 1584, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(5)(c)(I) amended, p. 1566, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(13)(b) repealed, p. 727, § 9, effective May 18; (5)(a.7) added and (5)(e) and (6) amended, p. 1291, §§ 10, 11, effective November 1.

L. 99:

(5)(h) and (5)(i) added, p. 1168, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(11) repealed, p. 842, § 28, effective May 24; (3)(d) added, p. 1056, § 1, effective May 26; (5.7) added, p. 236, § 7, effective July 1; (5)(c) amended, p. 1043, § 4, effective September 1; (3)(a) amended, p. 1496, § 3, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(3)(c.5) added, p. 502, § 3, effective May 16; (5.8) added, p. 658, § 7, effective May 30; (5)(g), (5)(h), and (5)(i) amended, p. 955, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(5)(a.5) amended and (5)(a.6) added, p. 125, § 2, effective March 26; (5.7)(a) amended, p. 666, § 11, effective May 28; (5)(g)(I) and (5.8) amended, p. 1017, § 22, effective June 1; (5)(a), (5)(a.5), (5)(a.6), and (5.8) amended and (5)(j) added, pp. 1185, 1192, 1181, §§ 19, 40, 5, effective July 1; (5)(g)(I) and (5)(h)(I) amended, p. 1152, § 8, effective July 1; (4)(a), (5)(a), (5)(a.6), (5)(a.7), (5)(b), (5)(c)(II)(D), and (6) amended, pp. 1500, 1566, §§ 159, 388, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(5)(g)(I) amended, p. 1433, § 25, effective April 29 and (5)(a) amended and (5)(a.3) added, p. 1436, § 33, effective July 1; (4)(a) amended, p. 813, § 3, effective July 1; (14) added, p. 2676, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(c) amended, p. 437, § 1, effective April 13; (10) amended and (15) added, p. 587, § 1, effective April 21.

L. 2006:

(5)(a) amended, p. 1054, § 7, effective May 25; (5)(k) added, p. 342, § 5, effective July 1; (5)(h)(IV) added by revision, pp. 1689, 1693, §§ 6, 17.

L. 2008:

IP(5.5)(a), (5.5)(c), and (5.5)(e) amended, p. 461, § 1, effective April 14; (5)(f)(I)(B), (5)(f)(I)(C), (5)(f)(I)(D), (5)(f)(I)(F), (5)(f)(I)(G), (5.5)(c)(I), (5.5)(c)(II), (5.5)(c)(III), and (5.5)(d)(II)(A) amended, p. 657, § 6, effective April 25; (5.5)(c)(II) amended, p. 1888, § 49, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(5.7)(a) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 784, § 24, effective April 29; (3.5) added, (HB 10-1374), ch. 261, p. 1187, § 9, effective May 25; (5.7)(d) amended, (HB 10-1260), ch. 403, p. 1986, § 75, effective July 1; (9)(a)(I) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2073, § 30, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(1)(a), (3)(c), and (3)(c.5) amended and (1)(e), (3)(e), (3)(f), (3)(g), (3)(h), (3)(h.1), and (4)(f) added, (SB 11-241), ch. 200, pp. 832, 833, 834, §§ 2, 3, 4, effective May 23; (3.5) amended, (HB 11-1064), ch. 234, p. 1010, § 2, effective May 27; (5.7)(d) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1156, § 29, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(3)(h.1)(I) amended, (HB 12-1310), ch. 268, p. 1403, § 27, effective June 7; (5.5)(b) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1617, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3)(h.1)(I) amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1932, § 47, effective October 1.

L. 2014:

(5)(a.3)(I) amended, (SB 14-163), ch. 391, p. 1969, § 4, effective June 6.

L. 2015:

(4)(f)(I) and (9)(a)(I) amended and (3.7) added, (HB 15-1122), ch. 37, p. 88, § 2, effective March 20;(5.5)(e) amended, (SB 15-124), ch. 251, p. 918, § 4, effective May 29; (5.9) added, (HB 15-1043), ch. 262, p. 998, § 10, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(4)(f)(I)(B) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 759, § 27, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

IP(5.7), (5.7)(a), and (5.7)(d) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1253, § 11, effective May 25; (3.5) amended, (SB 17-031), ch. 92, p. 281, § 7, effective August 9; (4)(f)(I) amended, (HB 17-1326), ch. 394, p. 2030, § 4, effective August 9; (5)(c)(I), (5)(f)(I)(B), (5)(f)(I)(D), (5.5)(a), and (5.5)(c)(I) amended and (5)(f)(I)(F) and (5.5)(e) repealed, (HB 17-1308), ch. 371, p. 1928, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(5)(a.3)(I) and (5)(a.6) amended, (HB 18-1029), ch. 153, p. 1087, § 2, effective April 23; (4)(f)(I)(D) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1700, § 19, effective May 29; (18) added, (HB 18-1410), ch. 394, p. 2353, § 2, effective June 6; (16) and (17) added, (HB 18-1251), ch. 272, p. 1669, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(c.2) added, (SB 19-165), ch. 242, p. 2373, § 1, effective May 20; (3)(h.1)(I), (4)(f)(I)(C), (4)(f)(I)(D), and IP(5)(c)(II) amended and (4)(f)(I)(E) and (19) added, (SB 19-143), ch. 286, p. 2658, § 3, effective May 28.

L. 2020:

(10) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 284, § 9, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(20) and (21) added, (SB 21-146), ch. 459, pp. 3083, 3086, §§ 4, 11, effective July 6.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) and (1)(c.2) amended and (1)(b) and (1)(c) repealed, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 23, § 27, effective February 25; (5.7)(a) and (5.7)(d) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1495, § 21, effective July 1; (1)(a) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3422, § 203, effective August 10.